trunk/apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo.found.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 601
	Sdefs: 11
	Paradigms: 81
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix -alignMonodix saldo.found.dix y

-->
<dictionary>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="v" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
		<sdef n="p" /> 
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="ut" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="nom" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
<pardef n="centr/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umets</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ums</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anas</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umens</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lund__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ars</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arnas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cd-rom__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mens</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kak/el__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>els</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lets</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>els</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lens</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ö__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dvd-rom">         <i>dvd-rom</i><par n="cd-rom__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="centrum">         <i>centr</i><par n="centr/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="exempel">         <i>exemp</i><par n="kak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="e-post">          <i>e-post</i><par n="lund__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ö">               <i>ö</i><par n="ö__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bark">            <i>bark</i><par n="lund__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lift">            <i>lift</i><par n="lund__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="budget">          <i>budget</i><par n="lund__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kakel">           <i>kak</i><par n="kak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="masscentrum">     <i>masscentr</i><par n="centr/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kapitel">         <i>kapit</i><par n="kak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lund">            <i>lund</i><par n="lund__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="segel">           <i>seg</i><par n="kak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tempel">          <i>temp</i><par n="kak/el__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="check">           <i>check</i><par n="lund__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="cd-rom">          <i>cd-rom</i><par n="cd-rom__n_v"/></e>
